Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND BORDERING PUBLIC WATER; SIBLEY COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 92.45 and 282.018, subdivision 1, and the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, Sibley County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited land bordering public water that is described in paragraph (c), under the remaining provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282. new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be sold is located in Sibley County and is described as: that part of Government Lot 3, Section 27, Township 114 North, Range 28 West, described as follows: commencing at the center of said Section 27; thence due South along the north-south quarter line of said Section 27, 559.30 feet; thence South 86 degrees 46 minutes 30 seconds West, 572.20 feet; thence South 30 degrees 04 minutes 33 seconds West, 541.52 feet; thence South 12 degrees 41 minutes 30 seconds West, 163.17 feet more or less to a point on the high bank line of High Island Lake, said point being the point of beginning; thence North 12 degrees 41 minutes 30 seconds East, 163.17 feet; thence South 71 degrees 05 minutes 30 seconds West, 199.05 feet to a point on the high bank line of High Island Lake; thence southeasterly along said high bank line to the point of beginning (0.35 acres) (parcel number 20.2712.000). new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the lands were returned to private ownership. new text end